src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_LÖPÖ
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1pö
!!€ löpö: löpö+N+Sg+Nom # gasoline
!!€ lövössä: löpö+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ löpöihin: löpö+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ lövöistä: löpö+N+Pl+Ela
0:pö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:vö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:vö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:vö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1pö non-standard
!!€ löpöin: löpö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ löpöhyn: löpö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:pö  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:pö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON N_VETO
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1to
!!€ veto: veto+N+Sg+Nom # draft
!!€ vedossa: veto+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ vetoihin: veto+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ vedoista: veto+N+Pl+Ela
0:to      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:to      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:do       N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:to      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:do       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:to      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:to      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:to      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:do       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1to non-standard
!!€ vetoin: veto+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ vetohon: veto+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:to   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON ; ! in NS's intro prose


LEXICON N_KUITU
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1to
!!€ kuitu: kuitu+N+Sg+Nom # fiber
!!€ kuidussa: kuitu+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ kuituihin: kuitu+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ kuiduista: kuitu+N+Pl+Ela
0:tu   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:du    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:du    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:tu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:tu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:tu   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:tu   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:tu   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tu      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:du       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:tu      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1tu non-standard
!!€ kuituin: kuitu+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ kuituhon: kuitu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:tu  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:tu   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN ; ! in NS's intro prose


LEXICON N_VETY
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1ty
!!€ vety: vety+N+Sg+Nom # hydrogen
!!€ vedyssä: vety+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ vetyihin: vety+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ vedyistä: vety+N+Pl+Ela
0:ty   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:dy    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:dy    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ty   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ty      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:dy       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ty      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1ty non-standard
!!€ vetyin: vety+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ vetyhyn: vety+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:ty  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ty   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON N_HÄÄTÖ
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1tö
!!€ häätö: häätö+N+Sg+Nom # evictment
!!€ häädössä: häätö+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ häädöistä: häätö+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ häätöihin: häätö+N+Pl+Ill
0:tö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:dö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:dö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:tö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:dö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:tö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1tö non-standard
!!€ häätöin: häätö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ häätöhön: häätö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:tö  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:tö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON N_RUNKO
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1nko
!!€ runko: runko+N+Sg+Nom # body
!!€ rungossa: runko+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ rungoista: runko+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ runkoihin: runko+N+Pl+Ill
0:ko      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:go    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:go    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:go       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1nko non-standard
!!€ runkoin: runko+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ runkohon: runko+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:ko  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ko   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON ; ! in NS's intro prose


LEXICON N_VINKU
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1nku
!!€ vinku: vinku+N+Sg+Nom # squeal
!!€ vingussa: vinku+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ vinguista: vinku+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ vinkuihin: vinku+N+Pl+Ill
0:ku   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:gu    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:gu    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:gu       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1nku non-standard
!!€ vinkuin: vinku+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ vinkuhun: vinku+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:ku  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN ; ! in NS's intro prose


LEXICON N_SÄNKY
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1nky
!!€ sänky: sänky+N+Sg+Nom # bed
!!€ sängyssä: sänky+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ sängyistä: sänky+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ sänkyihin: sänky+N+Pl+Ill
0:ky   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:gy    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:gy    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:gy       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1nky non-standard
!!€ sänkyin: sänky+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ sänkyhyn: sänky+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:ky  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON N_YLÄNKÖ
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1nkö
!!€ ylänkö: ylänkö+N+Sg+Nom # highlands
!!€ ylängössä: ylänkö+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ ylängöistä: ylänkö+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ ylänköihin: ylänkö+N+Pl+Ill
0:kö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:gö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:gö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:gö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1nkö non-standard
!!€ ylänköin: ylänkö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ ylänköhön: ylänkö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:kö  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON  N
ajolähtö+N:ajo#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
ankkurilyhty+N:ankkuri#lyh N_VETY  ;
apehanko+N:apehan N_RUNKO  ;
autoetu+N:auto#e N_KUITU  ;
autolähtö+N:auto#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
aviosääty+N:avio#sää N_VETY  ;
avojohto+N:avojoh N_VETO  ;
esitysmuoto+N:esitys#muo N_VETO  ;
etu+N:e N_KUITU  ;
fluorihiilivety+N:fluori#hiilive N_VETY  ;
haittatanko+N:haitta#tan N_RUNKO  ;
hartianseutu+N:hartian#seu N_KUITU  ;
hedelmätanko+N:hedelmä#tan N_RUNKO  ;
heisimato+N:heisi#ma N_VETO  ;
hengenlähtö+N:hengen#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
hiilikuitu+N:hiili#kui N_KUITU  ;
hiilisanko+N:hiili#san N_RUNKO  ;
hiilivety+N:hiili#ve N_VETY  ;
hinku+N:hin N_VINKU  ;
hiustenlähtö+N:hiusten#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
hunajalinko+N:hunaja#lin N_RUNKO  ;
hyytö+N:hyy N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
hyöty+N:hyö N_VETY  ;
häätö+N:hää N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
ilmaishoito+N:ilmais#hoi N_VETO  ;
intiaanirotu+N:intiaani#ro N_KUITU  ;
jokitasanko+N:joki#tasan N_RUNKO  ;
jouhimato+N:jouhi#ma N_VETO  ;
jyty+N:jy N_VETY  ;
jäänlähtö+N:jään#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
kaappisänky+N:kaappi#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
kaksoissänky+N:kaksois#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
kaniinirotu+N:kaniini#ro N_KUITU  ;
karhunruoto+N:karhun#ruo N_VETO  ;
karkeasäätö+N:karkea#sää N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
katossänky+N:katos#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
kaukosäätö+N:kauko#sää N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
kaulakääty+N:kaula#kää N_VETY  ;
kauppalaatu+N:kauppa#laa N_KUITU  ;
kerrossänky+N:kerros#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
kertasinko+N:kerta#sin N_RUNKO  ;
ketjuveto+N:ketju#ve N_VETO  ;
kevätaurinko+N:kevät#aurin N_RUNKO  ;
kilpalatu+N:kilpa#la N_KUITU  ;
kloorivety+N:kloori#ve N_VETY  ;
kookoskuitu+N:kookos#kui N_KUITU  ;
korkoehto+N:korko#eh N_VETO  ;
kulovahinko+N:kulo#vahin N_RUNKO  ;
kylmäverilähtö+N:kylmä#veri#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
kynttilälyhty+N:kynttilä#lyh N_VETY  ;
kytkentäjohto+N:kytkentä#joh N_VETO  ;
kyyrylähtö+N:kyyry#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
kätkölöytö+N:kätkö#löy N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
kävelykatu+N:kävely#ka N_KUITU  ;
kääty+N:kää N_VETY  ;
laivalöytö+N:laivalöy N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
lapsensänky+N:lapsen#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
lastensänky+N:lastensän N_SÄNKY  ;
latu+N:la N_KUITU  ;
lavasänky+N:lava#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
laverisänky+N:laveri#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
lehtimato+N:lehti#ma N_VETO  ;
leuanvetotanko+N:leuanveto#tan N_RUNKO  ;
liikkeellelähtö+N:liikkeelleläh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
linko+N:lin N_RUNKO  ;
lohtu+N:loh N_KUITU  ;
loismato+N:lois#ma N_VETO  ;
luuranko+N:luu#ran N_RUNKO  ;
lyhty+N:lyh N_VETY  ;
lähiseutu+N:lähi#seu N_KUITU  ;
lähtö+N:läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
lämmönsäätö+N:lämmön#sää N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
löpö+N:lö N_LÖPÖ  ;
maastalähtö+N:maastaläh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
maksamato+N:maksa#ma N_VETO  ;
matkaanlähtö+N:matkaanläh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
mehulinko+N:mehu#lin N_RUNKO  ;
mineraalikuitu+N:mineraali#kui N_KUITU  ;
morsiusneito+N:morsiusnei N_VETO  ;
muovisanko+N:muovi#san N_RUNKO  ;
napalanko+N:napa#lan N_RUNKO  ;
napaseutu+N:napa#seu N_KUITU  ;
nominaalimuoto+N:nominaali#muo N_VETO  ;
nopeudensäätö+N:nopeuden#sää N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
osakeosinko+N:osake#osin N_RUNKO  ;
otsanseutu+N:otsan#seu N_KUITU  ;
paperilyhty+N:paperi#lyh N_VETY  ;
parisänky+N:pari#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
parvisänky+N:parvi#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
pato+N:pa N_VETO  ;
perfluorihiilivety+N:perfluorihiilive N_VETY  ;
pihakatu+N:piha#ka N_KUITU  ;
pinnasänky+N:pinna#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
porvarissääty+N:porvaris#sää N_VETY  ;
potilasvahinko+N:potilas#vahin N_RUNKO  ;
puhto+N:puh N_VETO  ;
puoliverirotu+N:puoli#veri#ro N_KUITU  ;
pylvässänky+N:pylväs#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
pääkaupunkiseutu+N:pää#kaupunki#seu N_KUITU  ;
pöty+N:pö N_VETY  ;
raskasvety+N:raskas#ve N_VETY  ;
rautasänky+N:rauta#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
ravintokuitu+N:ravinto#kui N_KUITU  ;
riemuhuuto+N:riemuhuu N_VETO  ;
riipputanko+N:riipputan N_RUNKO  ;
ritarisääty+N:ritari#sää N_VETY  ;
ryhmälähtö+N:ryhmä#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
sairaalasänky+N:sairaala#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
salalyhty+N:sala#lyh N_VETY  ;
sammakonkutu+N:sammakonku N_KUITU  ;
sananmuoto+N:sananmuo N_VETO  ;
satovahinko+N:sato#vahin N_RUNKO  ;
siviilisääty+N:siviili#sää N_VETY  ;
sokkelisänky+N:sokkeli#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
sokkovaihto+N:sokko#vaih N_VETO  ;
suomenhevoslähtö+N:suomen#hevos#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
sydämenseutu+N:sydämen#seu N_KUITU  ;
syvänkö+N:syvän N_YLÄNKÖ  ;
syönnösvahinko+N:syönnös#vahin N_RUNKO  ;
sähkösokkihoito+N:sähkö#sokki#hoi N_VETO  ;
sängynpääty+N:sängyn#pää N_VETY  ;
sänky+N:sän N_SÄNKY  ;
taikalyhty+N:taika#lyh N_VETY  ;
tasamaahiihto+N:tasa#maa#hiih N_VETO  ;
teräsrunko+N:teräs#run N_RUNKO  ;
tunku+N:tun N_VINKU  ;
tupsumato+N:tupsu#ma N_VETO  ;
turvekuitu+N:turve#kui N_KUITU  ;
uloslähtö+N:ulosläh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
vaatetanko+N:vaate#tan N_RUNKO  ;
vallassääty+N:vallassää N_VETY  ;
vauvansänky+N:vauvan#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
vesisänky+N:vesi#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
vesivahinko+N:vesi#vahin N_RUNKO  ;
vierassänky+N:vierassän N_SÄNKY  ;
viinisato+N:viini#sa N_VETO  ;
vinku+N:vin N_VINKU  ;
vuoristoylänkö+N:vuoristo#ylän N_YLÄNKÖ  ;
väriliitu+N:väri#lii N_KUITU  ;
yhteislähtö+N:yhteis#läh N_HÄÄTÖ  ;
ylänkö+N:ylän N_YLÄNKÖ  ;
yläsänky+N:ylä#sän N_SÄNKY  ;
yty+N:y N_VETY  ;
